Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-224
Fuel and feed; inspection and sale; regulation.

A city of the first class by ordinance may provide for the inspection of electric light, water and gas meters, the inspection and weighing of hay, grain and coal, and the measuring of wood and fuel to be used in the city, and determine the place or places of the same. It may regulate and prescribe the place or places of exposing for sale of hay, coal and wood, provide for the appointment of an inspector, and fix the fees and duties of the inspector and of other persons authorized to perform such duties.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XXXI, p. 254;

Laws 1905, c. 25, § 2, p. 250;

R.S.1913, § 4840;

C.S.1922, § 4008;

C.S.1929, § 16-225;

R.S.1943, § 16-224.